Missouri, session 2026, HB1957.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.133, 115.155, 115.247, 115.281, 115.287, and 561.026,
RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
115.133, 115.155, 115.247, 115.281, 115.287, and 561.026, to read as follows:
115.133. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, any citizen of the
United States who is a resident of the state of Missouri and seventeen years and six months of
age or older shall be entitled to register and to vote in any election which is held on or after
his or her eighteenth birthday.
2. No person who is adjudged incapacitated shall be entitled to register or vote. No
person shall be entitled to vote:
(1) While confined under a sentence of imprisonment after conviction of a felony;
or
(2) [While on probation or parole after conviction of a felony, until finally discharged
from such probation or parole; or
(3)] After conviction of a felony [or misdemeanor] connected with the right of
suffrage.
3. Except as provided in federal law or federal elections and in section 115.277, no
person shall be entitled to vote if the person has not registered to vote in the jurisdiction of his
or her residence prior to the deadline to register to vote.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1957 2
4. Nothing in this section shall prohibit any defendant who is otherwise eligible
to vote and is confined in a jail from voting in an election if he or she has not yet been
convicted of a crime.
115.155. 1. The election authority shall provide for the registration of each voter.
Voter registration applications shall be made available in English, Spanish, and Braille.
Each application shall be in substantially the following form:
APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION
Are you a citizen of the United States?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
Will you be 18 years of age on or before election day?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
IF YOU CHECKED "NO" IN RESPONSE TO EITHER OF THESE
QUESTIONS, DO NOT COMPLETE THIS FORM.
IF YOU ARE SUBMITTING THIS FORM BY MAIL AND ARE
REGISTERING FOR THE FIRST TIME, PLEASE SUBMIT A COPY
OF A CURRENT, VALID PHOTO IDENTIFICATION. IF YOU DO
NOT SUBMIT SUCH INFORMATION, YOU WILL BE REQUIRED
TO PRESENT ADDITIONAL IDENTIFICATION UPON VOTING
FOR THE FIRST TIME SUCH AS A BIRTH CERTIFICATE, A
NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBAL DOCUMENT, OTHER PROOF OF
UNITED STATES CITIZENSHIP, A VALID MISSOURI DRIVER'S
LICENSE OR OTHER FORM OF PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION.
_________
_________
Township
(or Ward)
_________
__________________ _________
Name Precinct
_________
__________________ _________
Home Address Required
Personal
Identifica-
tion
Information
__________________

HB 1957 3
City ZIP
_________
__________________ _________
Place of
Date of Birth Birth
(Optional)
_________
__________________ _________
Mother's
Telephone Number Maiden
Name
(Optional) (Optional)
_________
__________________ _________
Last Place
Occupation (Optional) Previously
Registered
_________
__________________ _________
Last four digits of Social Under
Security Number What
(Required for registration Name
unless no Social Security
Number exists for Applicant)
_________
Remarks: _________
When
Political Party Affiliation
(OPTIONAL: You
shall be unaffiliated
unless you
designate an
affiliation.)
I am a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state of
Missouri. I have not been adjudged incapacitated by any court of law.

HB 1957 4
If I have been convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor connected
with the right of suffrage, I have had the voting disabilities resulting
from such conviction removed pursuant to law. I do solemnly swear
that all statements made on this card are true to the best of my
knowledge and belief.
I UNDERSTAND THAT IF I REGISTER TO VOTE KNOWING
THAT I AM NOT LEGALLY ENTITLED TO REGISTER, I AM
COMMITTING A CLASS ONE ELECTION OFFENSE AND MAY
BE PUNISHED BY IMPRISONMENT OF NOT MORE THAN FIVE
YEARS OR BY A FINE OF BETWEEN TWO THOUSAND FIVE
HUNDRED DOLLARS AND TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS OR BY
BOTH SUCH IMPRISONMENT AND FINE.
_________
__________________ _________
Signature of Voter Date
__________________
Signature of Election Official
2. The options for political party affiliation required by the application described in
subsection 1 of this section shall include all established political parties and an option to be
unaffiliated. If an applicant does not designate an affiliation, the election authority shall mark
the applicant's form as unaffiliated.
3. After supplying all information necessary for the registration records, each
applicant who appears in person before the election authority shall swear or affirm the
statements on the registration application by signing his or her full name, witnessed by the
signature of the election authority or such authority's deputy registration official. Each
applicant who applies to register by mail pursuant to section 115.159, or pursuant to section
115.160 or 115.162, shall attest to the statements on the application by his or her signature.
4. Upon receipt by mail of a completed and signed voter registration application, a
voter registration application forwarded by the division of motor vehicle and drivers licensing
of the department of revenue pursuant to section 115.160, or a voter registration agency
100 pursuant to section 115.162, the election authority shall, if satisfied that the applicant is
101 entitled to register, transfer all data necessary for the registration records from the application
102 to its registration system. Within seven business days after receiving the application, the
103 election authority shall send the applicant a verification notice. If such notice is returned as
104 undeliverable by the postal service within the time established by the election authority, the
105 election authority shall not place the applicant's name on the voter registration file.

HB 1957 5
106 5. If, upon receipt by mail of a voter registration application or a voter registration
107 application forwarded pursuant to section 115.160 or 115.162, the election authority
108 determines that the applicant is not entitled to register, such authority shall, within seven
109 business days after receiving the application, so notify the applicant by mail and state the
110 reason such authority has determined the applicant is not qualified. The applicant may file a
111 complaint with the elections division of the secretary of state's office under and pursuant to
112 section 115.219. If an applicant for voter registration fails to answer the question on the
113 application concerning United States citizenship, the election authority shall notify the
114 applicant of the failure and provide the applicant with an opportunity to complete the form in
115 a timely manner to allow for the completion of the registration form before the next election.
116 6. The secretary of state shall prescribe specifications for voter registration
117 documents so that they are uniform throughout the state of Missouri and comply with the
118 National Voter Registration Act of 1993, including the reporting requirements, and so that
119 registrations, name changes and transfers of registrations within the state may take place as
120 allowed by law.
121 7. All voter registration applications shall be preserved in the office of the election
122 authority.
115.247. 1. Each election authority shall provide all ballots for every election within
its jurisdiction. Ballots other than those printed by the election authority in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter shall not be cast or counted at any election.
2. Whenever it appears that an error has occurred in any publication required by the
provisions of this chapter, or in the printing of any ballot, any circuit court may, upon the
application of any voter, order the appropriate election authorities to correct the error or to
show cause why the error should not be corrected.
3. For each election held in a county with a charter form of government and with
more than two hundred fifty thousand but fewer than three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants,
the election authority may provide for each polling place in its jurisdiction fifty-five ballots
for each fifty and fraction of fifty voters registered in the voting district at the time of the
election. For each election, except a general election, held in any county other than a county
with a charter form of government and with more than two hundred fifty thousand but fewer
than three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, the election authority shall provide for each
polling place in its jurisdiction a number of ballots equal to at least one and one-third times
the number of ballots cast in the voting district served by such polling place at the election
held two years before at that polling place or at the polling place that served the voting district
in the previous election. For each general election held in any county other than a county
with a charter form of government and with more than two hundred fifty thousand but fewer
than three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, the election authority shall provide for each

HB 1957 6
polling place in its jurisdiction a number of ballots equal to one and one-third times the
number of ballots cast in the voting district served by such polling place or at the polling
place that served the voting district in the general election held four years prior. When
determining the number of ballots to provide for each polling place, the election authority
shall consider any factors that would affect the turnout at such polling place. The election
authority shall keep a record of the exact number of ballots delivered to each polling place.
For purposes of this subsection, the election authority shall not be required to count registered
voters designated as inactive pursuant to section 115.193.
4. After the polls have closed on every election day, the election judges shall return all
unused ballots to the election authority with the other election supplies.
5. All ballots cast in public elections shall be printed and distributed at public
expense, payable as provided in sections 115.063 to 115.077.
6. The election authority shall emboss and make available upon request ballots
in Braille for use by voters who are visually impaired.
115.281. 1. Except as provided in section 115.914, not later than the sixth Tuesday
prior to each election, or within fourteen days after candidates' names or questions are
certified pursuant to section 115.125, the election authority shall cause to have printed and
made available a sufficient quantity of absentee ballots, ballot envelopes and mailing
envelopes. As soon as possible after the proper officer calls a special state or county election,
the election authority shall cause to have printed and made available a sufficient quantity of
absentee ballots, ballot envelopes and mailing envelopes.
2. All absentee ballots for an election shall be in the same form as the official ballots
for the election, including ballots in Braille as required in section 115.247.
115.287. 1. Upon receipt of a signed application for an absentee ballot and if satisfied
the applicant is entitled to vote by absentee ballot, the election authority shall, within three
working days after receiving the application, or if absentee ballots are not available at the
time the application is received, within five working days after they become available, deliver
to the voter an absentee ballot, ballot envelope and such instructions as are necessary for the
applicant to vote. Delivery shall be made to the voter personally in the office of the election
authority or by bipartisan teams appointed by the election authority, or by first class,
registered, or certified mail at the discretion of the election authority, or in the case of a
covered voter as defined in section 115.902, the method of transmission prescribed in section
115.914. Where the election authority is a county clerk, the members of bipartisan teams
representing the political party other than that of county clerk shall be selected from a list of
persons submitted to the county clerk by the county chairman of that party. If no list is
provided by the time that absentee ballots are to be made available, the county clerk may
select a person or persons from lists provided in accordance with section 115.087. If the

HB 1957 7
election authority is not satisfied that any applicant is entitled to vote by absentee ballot, it
shall not deliver an absentee ballot to the applicant. Within three working days of receiving
such an application, the election authority shall notify the applicant and state the reason he or
she is not entitled to vote by absentee ballot. The applicant may file a complaint with the
elections division of the secretary of state's office under and pursuant to section 115.219.
2. If, after 5:00 p.m. on the second Wednesday before an election, any voter from the
jurisdiction is confined in a jail, has become hospitalized, becomes confined due to illness or
injury, or is confined in an intermediate care facility, residential care facility, or skilled
nursing facility on election day, as such terms are defined in section 198.006, in the county in
which the jurisdiction is located or in the jurisdiction of an adjacent election authority within
the same county, the election authority shall appoint a team to deliver, witness the signing of
and return the voter's application and deliver, witness the voting of and return the voter's
absentee ballot. If the election authority receives ten or more applications for absentee ballots
from the same address it shall appoint a team to deliver and witness the voting and return of
absentee ballots by voters residing at that address, except when such addresses are for an
apartment building or other structure wherein individual living units are located, each of
which has its own separate cooking facilities. Each team appointed pursuant to this
subsection shall consist of two registered voters, one from each major political party. Both
members of any team appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be present during the
delivery, signing or voting and return of any application or absentee ballot signed or voted
pursuant to this subsection.
3. On the mailing and ballot envelopes for each covered voter, the election authority
shall stamp prominently in black the words "FEDERAL BALLOT, STATE OF MISSOURI"
and "U.S. Postage Paid, 39 U.S.C. Section 3406".
4. No information which encourages a vote for or against a candidate or issue shall be
provided to any voter with an absentee ballot.
561.026. Notwithstanding any other provision of law except for section 610.140, a
person who is convicted:
(1) Of [any offense] a felony shall be disqualified from registering and voting in any
election under the laws of this state while confined under a sentence of imprisonment;
(2) Of a felony or misdemeanor connected with the exercise of the right of suffrage
shall be forever disqualified from registering and voting;
(3) Of any felony shall be forever disqualified from serving as a juror.
✔